Hawaii statutes.
§84-34 No compensation. The members of
the ethics commission shall serve without compensation but shall be allowed
their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties. [L 1972, c 163, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next